Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 7

Department of Economic and Community Development

4-3-701. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of economic and community development.

Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 4; modified.

Compiler's Notes. For creation of the economic cabinet council, see Executive Order No. 17 (March 2, 1988).

The department of economic and community development, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of economic and community development, §4-3-101.

4-3-702. Commissioner.

The department of economic and community development shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of economic and community development.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor.

The commissioner has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the operation of the department or to effectuate any of the programs or responsibilities of any of the divisions of the department. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 6, 16; modified; T.C.A., § 4-302; Acts 1984, ch. 666, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The phrase “from among nominations received by the governor from the Tennessee board for economic growth”, formerly appearing at the end of (b), was deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015 since the board no longer exists.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee board for economic growth, formerly referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 105, §§ 2 and 3, effective April 27, 2009.

Cross-References. Industrial development loans, §§4-31-306 —4-31-308.

4-3-703. General functions.

It is the function of the department of economic and community development to coordinate development services to communities, businesses and industries in the state.

Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 5; T.C.A., § 4-343.

Cross-References. Department to manage and supervise bonds issued by Mill Creek watershed flood control authority, §64-3-104.

Major energy projects, coordination of regulation, title 13, ch. 18.

4-3-704. Divisions — Creation.

There are created within the department of economic and community development the following divisions:

The administrative and support services division;

The industrial development division; and

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

The commissioner is authorized, with the consent of the governor, to appoint directors of these divisions, to combine, consolidate, or abolish any of these divisions, or to create such new divisions as are necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon the commissioner and this department.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; 1963, ch. 169, §§ 1, 3; 1972, ch. 852, § 10; 1976, ch. 468, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-343; Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 5; 2016, ch. 743, § 1.

Cross-References. Business enterprise office created, §4-26-101.

Office of business enterprise, duties, §4-3-728.

Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-705. Administrative and support services division — Functions.

It is the function of the administrative and support services division to provide development services and marketing programs for the other divisions of this department and to provide administrative and budgetary services for the entire department.

Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 11; T.C.A., § 4-343.

4-3-706. Industrial development — Powers and duties.

It is the function of the department of economic and community development to stimulate the creation of new jobs and income through services to business and industry.

The department shall exercise all of the administrative powers, duties and functions described in §§ 4-14-103 — 4-14-107.

The department has the power to make rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the administration of its functions and duties.

The department shall provide for the administration of title 68, chapter 202, part 1.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; 1963, ch. 169, §§ 2, 3; 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 4-331, 4-343; modified; Acts 1985, ch. 256, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (d), which provided that the former board for economic growth serve as an advisory commission to the commissioner of economic and community development, was deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee board for economic growth, formerly referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 105, §§ 2 and 3, effective April 27, 2009.

4-3-707. Industrial development authority — Transfer of duties.

The duties required of the Tennessee industrial development authority as of June 30, 1981, relative to the outstanding loan guarantees and commitments made by the authority, are transferred to the department of economic and community development.

Acts 1981, ch. 521, §§ 2, 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning transfer of moneys on deposit in the Tennessee industrial development authority fund on July 1, 1981, to the general fund, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1991.

4-3-708. Broadband accessibility grant program.

The commissioner of economic and community development is authorized to establish and administer the broadband accessibility grant program, referred to in this section as the “program,” for the purpose of promoting the deployment and adoption of broadband internet access services, referred to in this section as “broadband services.”

The program is funded through the Tennessee broadband accessibility fund, referred to in this section as the “fund,” established as a separate account in the general fund. Subject to the availability of revenue at the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to carry forward any amounts remaining in the fund or transfer any part of the fund to the revenue fluctuation reserve. Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6 for the sole benefit of the fund.

The fund is subject to appropriations by the general assembly and gifts, grants, and other donations received by the department of economic and community development for the program or fund.

The program is administered pursuant to policies developed by the department. The policies must provide for the awarding of grants to political subdivisions or entities of political subdivisions, corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships or other business entities that provide broadband services; cooperatives organized under the Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperative Act, compiled in title 65, chapter 25, or the Telephone Cooperative Act, compiled in title 65, chapter 29; and any other entity authorized by state law to provide broadband services.

Grants must be awarded to promote the deployment and adoption of broadband services with minimum download speeds of ten megabits per second (10 Mbps) and minimum upload speeds of one megabit per second (1 Mbps) to locations without broadband services at these minimum speeds. Grants must be awarded pursuant to criteria developed by the department of economic and community development, with priority given to projects that:

Serve locations without access to download speeds of at least ten megabits per second (10 Mbps) and upload speeds of at least one megabit per second (1 Mbps);

Propose to acquire and install infrastructure that supports broadband services scalable to higher download and upload speeds. However, this priority shall not take precedence over serving a greater number of locations or larger area;

Serve locations with demonstrated community support, including, but not limited to, documented support from the political subdivision or the political subdivision receiving designation as a broadband ready community pursuant to § 4-3-709;

Have not received funds or have not been designated to receive funds through other state or federally funded grant programs designed specifically to encourage broadband deployment in an area within a location without the minimum speeds as described in this subsection (e); and

Will provide higher download and upload speeds of broadband service to the locations served.

Notwithstanding subsection (e), the department may award a portion of grant funds to local libraries in this state for the purpose of assisting the libraries in offering digital literacy training pursuant to state library and archives guidelines.

Moneys in the fund may be used by the department of economic and community development for the purpose of administering the program. However, the expenses incurred to administer the program must not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount appropriated for the program in any fiscal year.

For any year in which grants are distributed under the program, the department shall produce a report on the status of grants under the program, including progress toward increased access to and adoption of broadband services. The report must be provided to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and speaker of the senate and published on the department's website.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-708 was transferred to §4-3-510 by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

§4-10-113, enacted by Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 3, provides that the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations is directed to study and prepare a report updating its January 2017 Report on broadband services which shall be delivered to the general assembly by January 15, 2021.

4-3-709. Designation as broadband ready community.

A political subdivision may apply to the department of economic and community development for designation as a “broadband ready community” pursuant to guidelines established by the department. The guidelines for designation must include a requirement that the political subdivision has adopted an efficient and streamlined ordinance or policy for reviewing applications and issuing permits related to projects relative to broadband services. The ordinance or policy must contain the following:

A single point of contact for all matters related to a project;

A provision that all applications related to a project will be reviewed and either approved or denied within thirty (30) business days after the application is submitted; and

An authorization that all forms, applications, and documentation related to a project may be signed by electronic means, where possible.

A political subdivision shall not be designated a broadband ready community if the ordinance or policy:

Requires an applicant to designate a final contractor to complete a project;

Imposes an unreasonable fee for reviewing an application or issuing a permit for a project. A fee that exceeds one hundred dollars ($100) is unreasonable for the purposes of this section;

Imposes a seasonal moratorium on the issuance of permits for projects; or

Discriminates among communications services providers or utilities with respect to any action related to a broadband project, including granting access to public rights-of-way, infrastructure and poles, and any other physical assets owned or controlled by the political subdivision.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-709 was transferred to4-3-511 by Acts 2016, ch. 743, § 11, effective April 7, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

4-3-710 — 4-3-713. [Reserved.]

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of economic and community development provide periodic reports to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives relative to corrective steps to address the audit findings of the office of the comptroller.

Acts 2006, ch. 936, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-3-714 (Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 11; 1988, ch. 654, § 1), concerning the energy advisory board, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 561, § 1, effective July 1, 2000. Acts 2000, ch. 561, § 2 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the energy advisory board, created by this section, terminated and ceased all activities on July 1, 2000.

4-3-715. Short title — Purpose.

Sections 4-3-715 — 4-3-717 shall be known and may be cited as “The Tennessee Job Growth Act of 2005” and are enacted for the purpose of establishing the FastTrack infrastructure development and job training assistance and economic development programs within the department of economic and community development to assist new and existing business and industry that locate or expand in this state and create or retain jobs.

Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 2; 2012, ch. 1038, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

4-3-716. FastTrack infrastructure development and job training assistance and economic development fund — Funding — Uses of fund — Legislative intent.

The FastTrack infrastructure development and job training assistance and economic development fund, referred to as the “FastTrack fund” in this section and in § 4-3-717, is established as a separate account in the general fund.

The FastTrack fund is composed of:

Funds appropriated by the general assembly for the FastTrack fund; and

Gifts, grants and other donations received by the department of economic and community development for the FastTrack fund.

Money in the FastTrack fund may be used by the department of economic and community development for program administration, marketing expenses and program evaluation; however, such expenses shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount appropriated for the program in any fiscal year.

Subject to the availability of revenue at the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to carry forward any amounts remaining in the FastTrack fund or transfer any part of the fund to the revenue fluctuation reserve.

Moneys in the FastTrack fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the FastTrack fund, and interest accruing on investments and deposits of such fund shall be returned to such fund and remain part of the FastTrack fund.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, to the extent practicable, money from the FastTrack fund shall be spent in all areas of the state.

It is the legislative intent that new commitments made by the commissioner of economic and community development for grants from the FastTrack fund shall not exceed the appropriations made for the purposes of the FastTrack infrastructure development, job training assistance and economic development programs. The commissioner of economic and community development is authorized, subject to the concurrence of the state funding board, to determine the amount of new commitments unlikely to be accepted based on historical program trends and may over-commit to the extent of such determination. In no event may such over-commitments exceed thirty percent (30%) of the appropriations available for new grants. It is further the legislative intent that in each fiscal year the FastTrack programs be managed so that actual expenditures and obligations to be recognized at the end of the fiscal year shall not exceed any available reserves and appropriations of the programs.

No less frequently than quarterly, the commissioner of economic and community development shall report to the commissioner of finance and administration the status of the appropriations for the FastTrack fund, such report to include at least the following information: the amount of each commitment accepted since the previous report and the name of the company receiving the benefit of such commitment, the total outstanding commitments and the total unobligated appropriation. A copy of each such report shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house of representatives and the speaker of the senate, the state treasurer, the state comptroller, the office of legislative budget analysis, and the secretary of state.

Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 3; 2010, ch. 1030, § 2; 2012, ch. 1038, §§ 2-5; 2016, ch. 797, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

4-3-717. Grants and loans.

FastTrack infrastructure development, training, and economic development grants from the FastTrack fund shall be made only where there is a commitment by a responsible official in an eligible business for the creation or retention of private sector jobs and private investment, or where the commissioner of economic and community development determines that such investment will have a direct impact on employment and investment opportunities in the future.

FastTrack industrial infrastructure and industrial site preparation grants or loans to assist eligible businesses may be made only to local governments or to their economic development organizations or other political subdivisions of the state.

Infrastructure grants may not be applied to private land or to land that is expected to become privately owned.

Land owned by a political subdivision of the state shall not be considered private land and any such land that is subject to a purchase option by a private entity shall not be considered to be land that is expected to become privately owned so long as the purchase option covering the land may not be exercised for a period of at least five (5) years following the date of an infrastructure grant pursuant to this section.

FastTrack industrial training grants from the FastTrack fund shall be awarded only to eligible businesses for industrial training under the following conditions:

To support the training of new employees for locating or expanding industries; and

To support the retraining of existing employees where retraining is required by the installation of new machinery or production processes.

FastTrack economic development grants or loans to assist eligible businesses may be made only to local governments or to their economic development organizations or other political subdivisions of the state. FastTrack economic development grants or loans may be used to facilitate economic development activities that are not eligible for FastTrack infrastructure development or job training assistance funds. These activities include, but are not limited to, grants or loans for retrofitting, relocating equipment, purchasing equipment, building repairs and improvements, temporary office space or other temporary equipment related to relocation or expansion. It is the intent of the general assembly that these economic development funds be used in exceptional circumstances when the funds will make a proportionally significant economic impact on the affected community.

The department of economic and community development shall notify and provide to the state funding board a detailed written explanation of the purpose for which a FastTrack economic development grant or loan is being awarded or used when FastTrack economic development grants or loans are awarded or used for activities that are not eligible for FastTrack infrastructure development or job training assistance funds.

The state funding board shall maintain as confidential any records or information obtained in accordance with subdivision (d)(2) that is otherwise confidential pursuant to state law.

The total amount of FastTrack grants or loans made pursuant to these programs shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per eligible business within any three-year period beginning July 1, 2005, unless approved by the state funding board. The state funding board is authorized to establish, by policy or action, the process by which the commissioner of economic and community development shall seek and receive approval for such grants and loans to exceed the dollar limitation.

In determining the level of grant assistance for infrastructure and site preparation consideration shall be given to local ability-to-pay with areas of lesser ability being eligible for higher grant rates.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall post the following information on its website at least quarterly:

The name of the company or entity receiving FastTrack funds;

The amount of the FastTrack funds received;

The number of jobs to be created by a project funded by FastTrack funds; and

The location of a project funded by FastTrack funds.

As used in §§ 4-3-715, 4-3-716 and this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Eligible business” means:

Manufacturing and other types of economic activities which export more than half of their products or services outside of Tennessee;

Businesses where more than half of the business' products or services enter into the production of exported products;

Businesses where the uses of the business' products primarily result in import substitution on the replacement of imported products or services with those produced in the state; or

Other types of economic activity, including, but not limited to, research funding, technology projects and other projects that contribute significantly to community development education as determined by the commissioner of economic and community development to have a beneficial impact on the economy of the state; and

“Industrial infrastructure” includes, but is not limited to, water, wastewater, or transportation systems, line extensions or industrial site preparation where it is demonstrated that such infrastructure improvements are necessary for the location or expansion of business or industry. Industrial infrastructure also means significant technological improvements, including, but not limited to, digital switches, fiber optic cabling or other technological improvements determined by the commissioner of economic and community development to have a beneficial impact on the economy of this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 4; 2012, ch. 1038, §§ 6-8; 2013, ch. 71, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 233, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made inviolation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-3-718. Propelling rural economic progress fund (P.R.E.P.).

The propelling rural economic progress fund, referred to as the “P.R.E.P. fund” in this part, is established as a separate account in the general fund.

The P.R.E.P. fund shall be composed of:

Funds appropriated by the general assembly for the P.R.E.P. fund; and

Gifts, grants, and other donations received by the department of economic and community development for the P.R.E.P. fund.

Moneys in the P.R.E.P. fund may be used by the department of economic and community development for program administration, marketing expenses, and program evaluation; provided, however, such expenses shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount appropriated for the program in any fiscal year.

Subject to the availability of revenue at the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration is authorized to carry forward any amounts remaining in the P.R.E.P. fund or transfer any part of the fund to the revenue fluctuation reserve.

Moneys in the P.R.E.P. fund shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the P.R.E.P. fund, and interest accruing on investments and deposits of the P.R.E.P. fund shall be returned to and remain part of the P.R.E.P. fund.

To the extent practicable, moneys from the P.R.E.P. fund shall be spent in all three (3) grand divisions of the state.

New commitments made by the commissioner of economic and community development for grants from the P.R.E.P. fund shall not exceed the appropriations made for the purposes of the program. In each fiscal year, the P.R.E.P. fund shall be managed so that actual expenditures and obligations to be recognized at the end of the fiscal year shall not exceed any available reserves and appropriations of the programs.

At least quarterly, the commissioner of economic and community development shall report to the commissioner of finance and administration the status of the commitments from the P.R.E.P. fund. The report shall include at least the following information: the amount of each commitment accepted since the previous report; the applicant receiving the benefit of each commitment; the total outstanding commitments; and the total unobligated balance. A copy of the report shall be transmitted to the speaker of the house of representatives and the speaker of the senate, the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees, the state treasurer, the state comptroller, the office of legislative budget analysis, and the secretary of state.

Acts 2016, ch. 1019, § 2.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1019, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rural Economic Opportunity Act of 2016”.

4-3-719. Grants from the P.R.E.P. fund.

Grants from the P.R.E.P. fund created in § 4-3-718 may be made in all counties where the commissioner of economic and community development determines that the grants will have a direct impact on employment and investment opportunities in the future.

Grants from the P.R.E.P. fund may be made only to local governments or their economic development organizations, other political subdivisions of the state, any subdivision of state government, or to not-for-profit organizations.

Grants from the P.R.E.P. fund may be used to facilitate economic development activities in rural areas or in a manner that directly impacts rural areas. These activities include: site development activities; infrastructure activities; tourism-related activities; planning activities; training and mentoring activities; entrepreneurship activities; significant technological improvements; or other economic development activities determined by the commissioner of economic and community development to have a beneficial impact on the economy of this state.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall post the following information on its website at least quarterly:

The name of each P.R.E.P. fund grant recipient;

The amount of each P.R.E.P. fund grant; and

A description of the project to be funded by each P.R.E.P. fund grant.

Acts 2016, ch. 1019, § 3.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1019, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rural Economic Opportunity Act of 2016”.

4-3-720. Short title — Purpose — Contributions made by governmental entity pursuant to master development plan.

This section shall be known, and may be cited as, the “Master Development Plan Recognition Act.”

The purpose of this section is to define those actions taken by a governmental entity that constitute contributions made by the governmental entity pursuant to a master development plan approved by the governmental entity for purposes of Section 118 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 118), as amended by Pub. L. No. 115-97, § 13312.

Contributions made by a governmental entity pursuant to a master development plan approved by the governmental entity within the meaning of Section 118 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 118), as amended by Pub. L. No. 115-97, § 13312, include, but are not limited to, the following:

Grants approved by the commissioner of economic and community development, including grants authorized or otherwise referenced in this part, regardless of whether the grants are also approved by any other agency, board, or other office of state government, and regardless when the funding in connection with the grant is authorized or paid, or both;

Grants approved by an authorized representative of any county or municipality within the state of Tennessee or any agency of, or entity created by, the county or municipality, whether the funding for the grants originates in whole or in part with the state of Tennessee or with the county or municipality, including, but not limited to, grants that are authorized by, or referenced in, this part, and regardless of when the funding in connection with the grant is authorized or paid, or both;

Tax increment financing applications for which a letter, or final, preliminary, or conditional approval, has been issued by an appropriate representative of state, county, or municipal government, and regardless of when the funding in connection with the tax increment financing application is authorized or paid, or both; and

Any other development plan, redevelopment plan, revitalization plan, or similar plan approved by an appropriate representative of state, county, or municipal government, and regardless of when the funding in connection with the plan is authorized or paid, or both.

Acts 2018, ch. 852, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 852, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contributions made by a governmental entity on or after December 22, 2017, which is the date of enactment of Pub. L. No. 115-97, § 13312.

4-3-721. Report relating to disaster resilience.

The commissioner of economic and community development is directed to report to the local government committee of the house of representatives and the state and local government committee of the senate each year on or before January 15 concerning the department of economic and community development's financial and program monitoring of the use of federal community development block grant funding to counties and municipalities from the United States department of housing and community development for disaster resilience purposes. The reports to the legislative committees shall continue annually until the commissioner certifies that no funds remain to be expended for disaster resilience from the federal community development block grant funding.

Acts 2018, ch. 947, § 1.

4-3-722. Tennessee Rural Hospital Transformation Act of 2018. [Effective until July 1, 2021.]

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Rural Hospital Transformation Act of 2018.”

As used in this section:

“Advisory committee” means a committee convened as often as necessary by the department that is composed of one (1) or more representatives from each of the following: department of health, department of labor and workforce development, bureau of TennCare, board of regents, and other public and private stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the department;

“Contractor” means individual consultants or professional firms, preferably with rural healthcare experience and expertise;

“Department” means the department of economic and community development;

“Rural hospital” means a hospital located outside of a major urban or suburban area; provided, that the hospital may be located within a metropolitan statistical area;

“Rural hospital transformation program” refers to a program administered by the department to support rural hospitals in assessing viability and identifying new delivery models, strategic partnerships, and operational changes that enable the continuation of needed healthcare services in rural communities;

“Target hospital” means a rural hospital determined to be eligible by the state for the rural hospital transformation program; and

“Transformation plan” means a strategic plan developed by one (1) or more contractors in close collaboration with target hospitals and community stakeholders to provide recommendations and actionable steps for preserving healthcare services in the target hospital community.

The department, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall establish and manage the rural hospital transformation program.

The department, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall identify one (1) or more contractors to provide consultations to target hospitals for the creation of transformation plans, which shall include:

Focused strategies for transitioning the hospital into a sustainable business model in order to avoid or prevent closure;

Recommendations for utilizing transformation funding to offset transition costs;

Recommendations for funding remaining transitions costs with hospital or community resources;

Recommendations for ensuring that appropriate and viable services are provided in the target hospital community, serving the best interests of the patients and caregivers;

Recommendations for strategic partnerships and alliances where practical; and

Where partnerships are not practical, recommendations for coordination with the surrounding healthcare community including safety-net providers and tertiary hospitals.

Target hospitals may submit applications to the department for review and approval to receive consultation from identified contractors for the development of a transition plan. The content of applications shall be directed by the department in consultation with the advisory committee.

Transformation plans shall be developed through collaboration between the contractor, target hospital, target hospital community stakeholders, and other appropriate stakeholders.

Finalized transformation plans shall include a timeline for implementation and must be submitted to the department.

The department shall receive periodic updates on the implementation of the transformation plans and monitor the progress of target hospitals.

The department's expenditures pursuant to this section shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per fiscal year.

This section is terminated on July 1, 2021.

Acts 2018, ch. 1055, § 1.

4-3-723 — 4-3-726. [Reserved.]

There is created a local government planning advisory committee composed of seven (7) officers of local governments to be appointed by the governor for a term of four (4) years; provided, that four (4) of the members shall be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years and three (3) for an initial term of two (2) years.

Membership on the committee shall terminate upon:

Separation of any member from local government office; or

The failure of any member to attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the committee.

The governor shall fill vacancies for any unexpired term.

No member shall serve for more than one (1) consecutive term.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. All members of the committee shall serve as such without compensation, but they shall be allotted necessary traveling and other appropriate expenses while engaged in the work of or for the committee.

The committee has the duty to exercise the powers over regional planning commissions provided for in §§ 13-3-101 and 13-3-102.

The committee shall adopt and implement a conflict of interest policy for committee members. The policy shall mandate annual written disclosures of financial interests, other possible conflicts of interest, and an acknowledgement by committee members that they have read and understand all aspects of the policy. The policy shall also require persons who are to be appointed to the committee to acknowledge, as a condition of appointment, that they are not in conflict with the conditions of the policy.

Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 7; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(51); T.C.A., § 13-102; T.C.A., §13-1-102; Acts 1983, ch. 442, § 2; 1985, ch. 104, § 1; 1988, ch. 548, § 3; 2011, ch. 509, § 3; 2013, ch. 252, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The local government planning advisory committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

4-3-728. Community development block grants to disadvantaged businesses.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in the allocation and use of community development block grants it is the policy of this state that a substantial portion of such grants shall be utilized whenever reasonably possible for the development of contracts with disadvantaged businesses as defined in § 4-26-102.

The office of business enterprise in the department of economic and community development shall advise the commissioner, or any other official with authority to allocate or disperse community block grants, of disadvantaged businesses that should be considered as recipients of such block grants.

The office of business enterprise shall annually report not later than December 1, to the general assembly, of all such advisements regarding disadvantaged businesses and the number of or amount of community block grants received by disadvantaged businesses.

Acts 1984, ch. 873, § 1.